Illinois, session 104th, HB2849.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Rights Act 5is amended by adding Section 6.2 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 745/6.2 new)7    Sec. 6.2. Utility services.8    (a) A park owner is prohibited from requiring a tenant to 9pay for utility services, such as water, sewer, and trash used 10in common areas in which a public utility company is charging 11for those services. If the public utility usage for common 12areas is not separately measured by equipment such as a water 13meter, the park owner may not charge the tenants for more than 1480% of the public utility services for which the park owner was 15billed.16    (b) On an annual basis, a park owner must provide tenants 17with a written explanation of how a tenant's share of the 18utility charge was calculated, and upon request from a tenant, 19must provide a copy of the park's monthly utility bills to 20tenants for any utility charge separately billed under this 21Section.